Maine, session 132, LD1515.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§96 is enacted to read:
96. Wheelchair adapted vehicles. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales of automobiles
adapted to accommodate a wheelchair actively occupied by an individual while the vehicle
is operated from the wheelchair or by another occupant of the vehicle or automobiles for
which the owner attests such modifications are necessary and will be completed within 6
months of the vehicle's purchase.
As used in this subsection, "adapted to accommodate a wheelchair" means equipped with
altered controls or a mechanical lifting device designed to accommodate a wheelchair.